pt-PT: Tipo de carne: Carne bovina; Bisonte; Frango; Pato; Cabra; Borrego; Avestruz; Faisão; À base de plantas; Carne de porco; Codorniz; Coelho; Peru; Carne de caça; Javali selvagem; Outro
lt-LT: Mėsos tipas: Jautiena; Bizoniena; Vištiena; Antiena; Ožkiena; Ėriena; Strutiena; Fazanų mėsa; Augalinės kilmės; Kiauliena; Putpelių mėsa; Triušiena; Kalakutiena; Elniena; Šerniena; Kita
vi: Loại thịt: Thịt bò; Bò rừng; Gà; Vịt; Dê; Cừu; Đà điểu; Gà lôi; Thịt chay; Thịt lợn; Chim cút; Thỏ; Gà tây; Thịt hươu nai; Lợn rừng; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta mesa: Govedina; Bizon; Piletina; Patka; Koza; Janjetina; Noj; Fazan; Na biljnoj bazi; Svinjetina; Prepelica; Zec; Puretina; Divljač; Veprovina; Ostalo
nb: Kjøttype: Storfekjøtt; Bison; Kylling; And; Geit; Lam; Struts; Fasan; Plantebasert; Svin; Vaktel; Kanin; Kalkun; Hjortekjøtt; Villsvin; Annet
en: Meat type: Beef; Bison; Chicken; Duck; Goat; Lamb; Ostrich; Pheasant; Plant-based; Pork; Quail; Rabbit; Turkey; Venison; Wild boar; Other
de: Fleischsorte: Rind; Bison; Hähnchen; Ente; Ziege; Lamm; Strauß; Fasan; Auf pflanzlicher Basis; Schwein; Wachtel; Kaninchen; Truthahn; Wild; Wildschwein; Sonstiges
da: Kødtype: Bøf; Bison; Kylling; And; Ged; Lam; Struds; Fasan; Plantebaseret; Svin; Vagtel; Kanin; Kalkun; Vildtkød; Vildsvin; Andet
ru: Тип мяса: Говядина; Бизон; Курица; Утка; Козлятина; Баранина; Страус; Фазан; На растительной основе; Свинина; Перепела; Кролик; Индейка; Оленина; Дикий кабан; Другое
es: Tipo de carne: Ternera; Bisonte; Pollo; Pato; Cabra; Cordero; Avestruz; Faisán; De origen vegetal; Cerdo; Codorniz; Conejo; Pavo; Venado; Jabalí; Otros
fi: Lihatyyppi: Nauta; Biisoni; Kana; Ankka; Vuohi; Lammas; Strutsi; Fasaani; Kasvipohjainen; Porsas; Viiriäinen; Kani; Kalkkuna; Hirvi/peura; Villisika; Muu
ko: 고기 종류: 소고기; 들소; 닭고기; 오리; 염소; 양고기; 타조; 꿩; 식물 기반; 돼지고기; 메추라기; 토끼; 칠면조; 사슴고기; 야생 멧돼지; 기타
th: ประเภทเนื้อสัตว์: เนื้อวัว; เนื้อควายไบซัน; ไก่; เป็ด; แพะ; เนื้อแกะ; เนื้อนกกระจอกเทศ; ไก่ฟ้า; เนื้อทำจากพืช; เนื้อหมู; นกคุ่ม; กระต่าย; ตุรกี; เนื้อกวาง; เนื้อหมูป่า; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di carne: Manzo; Bisonte; Pollo; Anatra; Capra; Agnello; Struzzo; Fagiano; A base vegetale; Maiale; Quaglia; Coniglio; Tacchino; Carne di cervo; Cinghiale; Altro
pl: Typ mięsa: Wołowina; Bizon; Kurczak; Kaczka; Koza; Jagnięcina; Struś; Bażant łowny; Roślinny; Wieprzowina; Przepiórka; Królik; Indyk; Sarnina; Dzik; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta mesa: Govedina; Bizon; Piščanec; Raca; Koza; Jagnjetina; Noj; Fazan; Na rastlinski osnovi; Svinjina; Prepelica; Zajec; Puran; Divjačina; Divji prašič; Drugo
el: Τύπος κρέατος: Βοδινό κρέας; Βίσονας; Κοτόπουλο; Για το χιόνι; Κατσίκα; Αρνάκι; Στρουθοκάμηλος; Φασιανός; Φυτικής προέλευσης; Χοιρινό; Ορτύκι; Κουνέλι; Γαλοπούλα; Ελάφι; Αγριόχοιρος; Άλλο
zh-CN: 肉类: 牛肉; 野牛; 鸡肉; 鸭蛋; 山羊; 羊肉; 鸵鸟肉; 野鸡蛋; 植物肉; 猪肉; 鹌鹑蛋; 兔子; 火鸡肉; 鹿肉; 野猪肉; 其他
fr: Type de viande: Bœuf; Bison; Poulet; Canard; Chèvre; Agneau; Autruche; Faisan; À base de plantes; Porc; Caille; Lapin; Dinde; Gibier; Sanglier; Autre
nl: Vleestype: Rundvlees; Bison; Kip; Eend; Geit; Lam; Struisvogel; Fazant; Plantaardig; Varkensvlees; Kwartel; Konijn; Kalkoen; Hert; Wild zwijn; Andere
hu: Hús típusa: Marhahús; Bölény; Csirke; Kacsa; Kecske; Bárány; Strucc; Fácán; Növényi alapú; Sertés; Fürj; Nyúl; Pulyka; Szarvas/őz; Vaddisznó; Egyéb
tr: Et Türü: Dana; Bizon; Tavuk; Ördek; Keçi; Kuzu; Devekuşu; Sülün; Bitki bazlı; Domuz; Bıldırcın; Tavşan; Hindi; Geyik eti; Yaban domuzu; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de carne: Carne bovina; Carne de búfalo; Galinha; Pato; Cabra; Carne de cordeiro; Carne de avestruz; Faisão; À base de plantas; Carne de porco; Codorna; Coelho; Peru; Carne de veado; Carne de javali selvagem; Outro
zh-TW: 肉類類型: 牛肉; 野牛; 雞肉; 鴨子; 山羊; 羊肉; 鴕鳥; 雉雞; 植物性; 豬肉; 鵪鶉; 兔子; 火雞肉; 鹿肉; 野豬; 其他
sv: Köttyp: Nötkött; Bison; Kyckling; Anka; Get; Lamm; Struts; Fasan; Växtbaserad; Fläsk; Vaktel; Kanin; Kalkon; Vilt; Vildsvin; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ mäsa: Hovädzie mäso; Bizón; Kuracie; Kačka; Koza; Jahňacie; Pštros; Bažant; Rastlinné; Bravčové mäso; Prepelica; Králik; Moriak; Zverina; Diviak; Iné
bg-BG: Тип месо: Говеждо месо; Бизон; Пилешко; Патешко; Козе; Агнешко; Щраус; Фазан; На растителна основа; Свинско; Пъдпъдък; Заек; Пуешко; Еленско месо; Дива свиня; Други
ro-RO: Tip carne: Vită; Bizon; Pui; Rață; Capră; Miel; Struț; Fazan; Pe bază de plante; Porc; Prepeliță; Iepure; Curcan; Vânat; Mistreț; Altele
cs: Druh masa: Hovězí maso; Maso z bizona; Kuřecí maso; Kachna; Koza; Jehněčí maso; Pštrosí maso; Bažant; Na rostlinné bázi; Vepřové maso; Křepelka; Králík; Krůtí maso; Zvěřina; Maso z divočáka; Jiné
ja: 肉の種類: ビーフ; バイソン; 鶏肉; ダック; ヤギ; ラム; ダチョウ; キジ; 植物由来; ポーク; ウズラ; ウサギ; 七面鳥; 鹿肉; イノシシ; その他